California, session 20252026, AB98.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) The State Fire Marshal is required to classify areas in the state into fire hazard severity zones. Certain state-owned parcels, however, fall within local responsibility areas as designated by the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection. The parcels addressed in this act have been identified as local responsibility areas and are located within a very high fire hazard severity zone.(2) The City of Moreno Valley seeks to perform annual wildfire mitigation activities and inspections on these parcels, consistent with the practices applied to other properties within the city, and to expand recreational and outdoor space amenities for public use.(3) These parcels are situated in close proximity to schools, residential neighborhoods, a college campus, and a fire station, and currently lack regular maintenance and wildfire prevention measures.(4) The City of Moreno Valley has made a commitment that once the parcels in this act are quitclaimed to the city, the city will obtain the best Public Protection Classification, more commonly known as an ISO Rating, through wildfire mitigation efforts, in order to reduce insurance premiums in that area.(5) On or around 1989, Assessor’s Parcel Numbers 304-020-008 and 304-280-006 were conveyed to the City of Moreno Valley and, subsequently, deeded from the city to the state at no cost. The original transferor, who continues to operate within the city, has expressed a willingness to provide testimony in support of returning these parcels and the neighboring nine parcels to the city to fulfill the intent of the original conveyance and to enable the development of extensive public open-space trails.(b) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature to facilitate the transfer of these parcels to the City of Moreno Valley to promote enhanced wildfire mitigation, public safety, including improved Public Protection Classification ratings, and community access to recreational open space.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 14673.13 is added to the Government Code, to read:14673.13. (a) The Subject to the requirements in subdivision (d), the Director of General Services shall quitclaim to the City of Moreno Valley, at no cost to the city, all interests of the state in the following 10 11 parcels of land located within the City of Moreno Valley that consist mainly of undeveloped open-space land, including mountains and hills:(1)APN: 304-020-008.(2)APN: 304-280-009.(3)APN: 308-030-004.(4)APN: 308-030-006.(5)APN: 308-030-008.(6)APN: 308-030-009.(7)APN: 308-030-010.(8)APN: 308-030-013.(9)APN: 308-030-014.(10)APN: 308-050-008.(1) APN: 304-020-008, consisting of 695.29 acres.(2) APN: 304-280-006, consisting of 107.48 acres.(3) APN: 304-280-009, consisting of 1.94 acre.(4) APN: 308-030-004, consisting of 2.99 acres.(5) APN: 308-030-006, consisting of 84.25 acres.(6) APN: 308-030-008, consisting of 33.24 acres.(7) APN: 308-030-009, consisting of 162.32 acres.(8) APN: 308-030-010, consisting of 90.60 acres.(9) APN: 308-030-013, consisting of 4.11 acres.(10) APN: 308-030-014, consisting of 0.84 acre.(11) APN: 308-050-008, consisting of 79.15 acres.(b) The City of Moreno Valley shall use the land to conduct wildfire mitigation to ensure fire protection for residents and businesses, to increase open-space and outdoor recreational opportunities, and any other similar use the City of Moreno Valley deems necessary.(c) The parcels of land identified in this section are not subject to Section 11011.1. exempt from Section 11011.1 and Article 8 (commencing with Section 54220) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5.(d) The Director of General Services shall quitclaim a parcel of land listed in subdivision (a) only if all of the following requirements are met:(1) The parcel is located in a very high fire hazard severity zone, as identified by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 51178.(2) The parcel, or any part of the parcel, is located within two miles of critical infrastructure.(3) The parcel is designated as being in a local responsibility area and the City of Moreno Valley has responsibility for fire prevention and suppression.(e) For purposes of this section, “critical infrastructure” includes residential housing, schools, water towers, power facilities, transportation systems, and public safety facilities.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique conditions in the City of Moreno Valley that make it vulnerable to potential wildfires, and the need to mitigate those threats.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. The Legislature finds and declares that the addition of Section 14673.13 to the Government Code by this act serves a public purpose of promoting necessary wildfire mitigation to benefit residents and businesses located in areas vulnerable to wildfires and does not constitute a gift of public funds within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.